Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1701.05
Writs and orders; endorsement.

The sheriff shall endorse upon every summons, order of arrest, order for the delivery of property, order of attachment, or injunction the day and the hour it was received by him or her.

R.S.1867, Code § 890, p. 548;

R.S.1913, § 8564;

C.S.1922, § 9515;

C.S.1929, § 20-2216;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 25-2215;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 11.

Fees, see section 33-117.